Missouri, session 2026, HB2409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to
be known as sections 135.1310, 135.1325, and 135.1350, to read as follows:
135.1310. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Child Care
Contribution Tax Credit Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Child care", the same as defined in section 210.201;
(2) "Child care desert", a census tract that has a poverty rate of at least twenty
percent or a median family income of less than eighty percent of the statewide average
and where at least five hundred people or thirty-three percent of the population are
located at least one-half mile away from a child care provider in urbanized areas or at
least ten miles away in rural areas;
(3) "Child care provider", a child care provider as defined in section 210.201
that is licensed under section 210.221, or that is unlicensed and that is contracted with
the department of elementary and secondary education;
(4) "Contribution", an eligible donation of cash, stock, bonds or other
marketable securities, or real property. "Contribution" shall include the reasonable
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2409 2
purchase price paid for an employer's purchase of child care from a child care provider
for the children of the employer's employees;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(6) "Intermediary", a nonprofit organization that is, or agrees to become,
subject to the jurisdiction of this state for the purposes of the administration and
enforcement of this section, and that distributes funds for the purposes of supporting a
child care provider;
(7) "Person related to the taxpayer", an individual connected with the taxpayer
by blood, adoption, or marriage, or an individual, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, trust, or association controlled by, or under the control of, the
taxpayer directly, or through an individual, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, trust, or association under the control of the taxpayer;
(8) "Rural area", a town or community within the state that is not within a
metropolitan statistical area and has a population of six thousand or fewer inhabitants
as determined by the last preceding federal decennial census or any unincorporated
area not within a metropolitan statistical area;
(9) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by a taxpayer pursuant to chapter
143 or chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the withholding of tax as
provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;
(10) "Tax credit", a credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability;
(11) "Taxpayer", a corporation as defined in section 143.441 or 143.471, any
charitable organization that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri
unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed pursuant to chapter 143, or individuals or partnerships subject to the state
income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer may
claim the tax credit authorized in this section against the taxpayer's state tax liability for
the tax year in which a verified contribution was made in an amount equal to seventy-
five percent of the verified contribution to a child care provider or intermediary. The
minimum amount of any tax credit issued shall not be less than one hundred dollars and
shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars per tax year.
(2) A child care provider or intermediary shall apply to the department to
participate in the program established in this section, using a form prescribed by the
department. The department shall determine eligibility and enter into an agreement
that meets the requirements of section 620.017 with an eligible child care facility or
intermediary. Only contributions to child care providers and intermediaries that have

HB 2409 3
entered into an agreement with the department may receive a tax credit pursuant to this
section.
(3) The child care provider or intermediary receiving a contribution shall,
within sixty days of the date it received the contribution, file a contribution verification
with the department and issue a copy of the contribution verification to the taxpayer.
The contribution verification shall be in the form established by the department and
shall include the taxpayer's name, taxpayer's state or federal tax identification number
or last four digits of the taxpayer's Social Security number, amount of tax credit sought,
amount or description of contribution, legal name and address of the child care provider
receiving the tax credit, the child care provider's federal employer identification
number, the child care provider's department of elementary and secondary education
vendor number or license number, the date the child care provider received the
contribution from the taxpayer, and any other information requested by the
department. The contribution verification shall include a signed attestation stating,
in the case of a child care provider, that the child care provider will use the contribution
solely to promote child care and, in the case of an intermediary, that the intermediary
will distribute the contribution and any income thereon in full to one or more child care
providers within two years of receipt.
(4) The failure of the child care provider or intermediary to timely issue the
contribution verification to the taxpayer or file it with the department shall entitle the
taxpayer to a refund of the contribution from the child care provider or intermediary.
4. A contribution, whether received from the taxpayer claiming the tax credit
pursuant to this section or from an intermediary, is eligible when:
(1) The contribution is used directly by the child care provider to promote child
care for children twelve years of age or younger, including by acquiring or improving
child care facilities, equipment, or services, staff salaries, staff training, or improving
the quality of child care;
(2) The contribution, if made to an intermediary, is distributed in full by the
intermediary within two years of receipt to one or more child care providers for the sole
purpose of promoting child care for children twelve years of age or younger;
(3) The contribution is made to a child care provider or intermediary in which
the taxpayer or a person related to the taxpayer does not have a direct financial interest;
(4) The contribution made to an intermediary is not designated for a child care
provider in which the taxpayer or a person related to the taxpayer has a direct financial
interest; and

HB 2409 4
(5) The contribution is not made in exchange for care of a child or children,
unless the contribution is made by an employer in purchasing child care for the children
of the employer's employees.
5. A child care provider or intermediary that uses the contribution for an
ineligible purpose shall repay to the department the value of the tax credit for the
contribution amount used for such ineligible purpose. An intermediary that accepts a
contribution and issues a taxpayer a contribution verification is itself permanently
ineligible to claim or redeem a tax credit pursuant to this section.
6. (1) The tax credits authorized by this section shall not be refundable and shall
not be transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed. Any amount of approved tax credits
that a taxpayer is prohibited by this subsection from using for the tax year in which the
credit is first claimed may be carried forward to the taxpayer's subsequent tax year for
up to six succeeding tax years.
(2) In the case of a taxpayer that has or elects pass-through taxation pursuant to
100 federal income tax law, the tax credits issued pursuant to this section shall be
101 apportioned in proportion to the share of ownership of the taxpayer on the last day of
102 the taxpayer's tax period for which such tax credits will be issued, to the following:
103 (a) The shareholders of the S corporation;
104 (b) The partners in a partnership; or
105 (c) The members of a limited liability company that has or elects pass-through
106 taxation pursuant to federal income tax law.
107 (3) A taxpayer shall not claim a tax credit pursuant to this section and a tax
108 credit pursuant to section 135.1325 or 135.1350 for the same contribution or
109 expenditure.
110 7. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 6 of this section to the contrary, a
111 taxpayer that is exempt, under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), and any amendments
112 thereto, from all or part of the federal income tax shall be eligible for a refund of its tax
113 credit issued under this section, without regard to whether it has incurred any state tax
114 liability. Such exempt taxpayer may claim a refund of the tax credit on its tax return
115 required to be filed under the provisions of chapter 143, exclusive of the return for the
116 withholding of tax under sections 143.191 to 143.265. If such exempt taxpayer is not
117 required to file a tax return under the provisions of chapter 143, the exempt taxpayer
118 may claim a refund of the tax credit on a refund claim form prescribed by the
119 department of revenue. The department of revenue shall prescribe such forms,
120 instructions, and rules as it deems appropriate to carry out the provisions of this
121 subsection.

HB 2409 5
122 8. (1) The amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to this section shall not
123 exceed twenty million dollars for each calendar year. The department shall approve tax
124 credit applications on a first-come, first-served basis until the tax credit authorization
125 limit is reached for the calendar year. A taxpayer shall apply to the department for the
126 child care contribution tax credit by submitting a copy of the contribution verification
127 provided by a child care provider or intermediary to such taxpayer. Upon receipt of
128 such contribution verification, the department shall issue a tax credit certificate to the
129 taxpayer.
130 (2) If the maximum amount of tax credits allowed in any calendar year as
131 provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection is authorized, the maximum
132 amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
133 increased by fifteen percent for such calendar year, provided that all such increases in
134 the allowable amount of tax credits shall be reserved for contributions made to child
135 care providers located in a child care desert. The director of the department shall
136 publish such adjusted amount.
137 9. The tax credits allowed under this section shall be considered a domestic and
138 social tax credit under subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 135.800.
139 10. All action and communication undertaken or required under this section
140 shall be exempt from section 105.1500.
141 11. The department may promulgate rules to implement and administer the
142 provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
143 536.010, that is created pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become
144 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
145 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
146 of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
147 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
148 unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
149 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
150 12. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
151 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
152 six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by the general
153 assembly;
154 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
155 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
156 section is sunset; and
157 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or in any way
158 impair the department of revenue's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before

HB 2409 6
159 the date the program authorized under this section expires or a taxpayer's ability to
160 redeem such tax credits.
135.1325. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Employer
Provided Child Care Assistance Tax Credit Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Child care desert", a census tract that has a poverty rate of at least twenty
percent or a median family income of less than eighty percent of the statewide average
and where at least five hundred people or thirty-three percent of the population are
located at least one-half mile away from a child care provider in urbanized areas or at
least ten miles away in rural areas;
(2) "Child care facility", a child care facility as defined in section 210.201 that is
licensed pursuant to section 210.221, or that is unlicensed and that is contracted with the
department of elementary and secondary education;
(3) "Child care provider", a child care provider as defined in section 210.201
that is licensed pursuant to section 210.221, or that is unlicensed and that is contracted
with the department of elementary and secondary education;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(5) "Employer matching contribution", a contribution made by the taxpayer to
a cafeteria plan, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Section 125, of an employee of the
taxpayer, which matches a dollar amount or percentage of the employee's contribution
to the cafeteria plan. "Employer matching contribution" shall not include the amount
of any salary reduction or other compensation foregone by the employee in connection
with the cafeteria plan;
(6) "Qualified child care expenditure", an amount paid of reasonable costs
incurred that meet any of the following:
(a) To acquire, construct, rehabilitate, or expand property that will be, or is,
used as part of a child care facility that is either operated by the taxpayer or contracted
with by the taxpayer and which does not constitute part of the principal residence of the
taxpayer or any employee of the taxpayer;
(b) For the operating costs of a child care facility of the taxpayer, including costs
relating to the training of child care employees, scholarship programs, and for
compensation to child care employees;
(c) Under a contract with a child care facility to provide child care services to
employees of the taxpayer; or
(d) As an employer matching contribution, but only to the extent such employer
matching contribution is restricted by the taxpayer solely for the taxpayer's employee to

HB 2409 7
obtain child care services at a child care facility and is used for that purpose during the
tax year;
(7) "Rural area", a town or community within the state that is not within a
metropolitan statistical area and has a population of six thousand or fewer inhabitants
as determined by the last preceding federal decennial census or any unincorporated
area not within a metropolitan statistical area;
(8) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by the taxpayer pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 143 or chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;
(9) "Tax credit", a credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability;
(10) "Taxpayer", a corporation as defined in section 143.441 or 143.471, any
charitable organization that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri
unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143, or individuals or partnerships subject to the state income
tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143.
3. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer with two or
more employees may claim a tax credit authorized in this section in an amount equal to
thirty percent of the qualified child care expenditures paid or incurred with respect to a
child care facility in order to provide child care to the taxpayer's employees. The
maximum amount of any tax credit issued under this section shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars per taxpayer per tax year.
4. A facility shall not be treated as a child care facility with respect to a taxpayer
unless enrollment in the facility is open to the dependents of employees of the taxpayer
during the tax year, provided that the dependents fall within the age range ordinarily
cared for by, and only require a level of care ordinarily provided by, such facility.
5. (1) The tax credits authorized by this section shall not be refundable or
transferable. The tax credits shall not be sold, assigned, or otherwise conveyed. Any
amount of approved tax credits that a taxpayer is prohibited by this subsection from
using for the tax year in which the credit is first claimed may be carried forward to the
taxpayer's subsequent tax year for up to six succeeding tax years.
(2) In the case of a taxpayer that has or elects pass-through taxation pursuant to
federal income tax law, the tax credits issued pursuant to this section shall be
apportioned in proportion to the share of ownership of the taxpayer on the last day of
the taxpayer's tax period for which such tax credits will be issued, to the following:
(a) The shareholders of the S corporation;
(b) The partners in a partnership; or

HB 2409 8
(c) The members of a limited liability company that has or elects pass-through
taxation pursuant to federal income tax law.
(3) A taxpayer shall not claim a tax credit pursuant to this section and a tax
credit pursuant to section 135.1310 or 135.1350 for the same contribution or
expenditure.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 5 of this section to the contrary, a
taxpayer that is exempt, under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), and any amendments
thereto, from all or part of the federal income tax shall be eligible for a refund of its tax
credit issued under this section, without regard to whether it has incurred any state tax
liability. Such exempt taxpayer may claim a refund of the tax credit on its tax return
required to be filed under the provisions of chapter 143, exclusive of the return for the
withholding of tax under sections 143.191 to 143.265. If such exempt taxpayer is not
required to file a tax return under the provisions of chapter 143, the exempt taxpayer
may claim a refund of the tax credit on a refund claim form prescribed by the
department of revenue. The department of revenue shall prescribe such forms,
instructions, and rules as it deems appropriate to carry out the provisions of this
subsection.
7. (1) The amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to this section shall not
exceed twenty million dollars for each calendar year. The department shall approve tax
credit applications on a first-come, first-served basis until the tax credit authorization
limit is reached for the calendar year.
(2) If the maximum amount of tax credits allowed in any calendar year as
provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection is authorized, the maximum
amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
increased by fifteen percent for such calendar year, provided that all such increases in
the allowable amount of tax credits shall be reserved for qualified child care
expenditures for child care facilities located in a child care desert. The director of
the department shall publish such adjusted amount.
8. A taxpayer who has been issued a tax credit under this section shall notify the
100 department within sixty days of any cessation of operation, change in ownership, or
101 agreement to assume recapture liability as such terms are defined by 26 U.S.C. Section
102 45F, in the form and manner prescribed by department rule or instruction. If there is a
103 cessation of operation or change in ownership relating to a child care facility, the
104 department may require the taxpayer to repay the department an amount equal to the
105 credit issued under this section, but this recapture amount shall be limited to the tax
106 credit allowed under this section. The recapture amount shall be considered a tax
107 liability arising on the tax payment due date for the tax year in which the cessation of

HB 2409 9
108 operation, change in ownership, or agreement to assume recapture liability occurred
109 and shall be assessed and collected under the same provisions that apply to a tax liability
110 under chapter 143 or chapter 148, provided that no interest shall be assessed against any
111 amounts recaptured pursuant to this subsection.
112 9. The tax credit allowed pursuant to this section shall be considered a domestic
113 and social tax credit under subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 135.800.
114 10. All action and communication undertaken or required under this section
115 shall be exempt from section 105.1500.
116 11. The department may promulgate rules to implement and administer the
117 provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
118 536.010, that is created pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become
119 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
120 if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
121 of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
122 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
123 unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
124 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
125 12. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
126 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
127 six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by the general
128 assembly;
129 (2) The act shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
130 following the calendar year in which the program authorized under the act is sunset;
131 and
132 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or in any way
133 impair the department of revenue's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before
134 the date the program authorized under this section expires or a taxpayer's ability to
135 redeem such tax credits.
135.1350. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Child Care
Providers Tax Credit Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Capital expenditures", expenses incurred by a child care provider, during
the tax year for which a tax credit is claimed pursuant to this section, for the
construction, renovation, or rehabilitation of a child care facility to the extent necessary
to operate a child care facility and comply with applicable child care facility regulations
promulgated by the department of elementary and secondary education;

HB 2409 10
(2) "Child care desert", a census tract that has a poverty rate of at least twenty
percent or a median family income of less than eighty percent of the statewide average
and where at least five hundred people or thirty-three percent of the population are
located at least one-half mile away from a child care provider in urbanized areas or at
least ten miles away in rural areas;
(3) "Child care facility", a child care facility as defined in section 210.201 that is
licensed pursuant to section 210.221, or that is unlicensed and that is contracted with the
department of elementary and secondary education;
(4) "Child care provider", a child care provider as defined in section 210.201
that is licensed pursuant to section 210.221, or that is unlicensed and that is contracted
with the department of elementary and secondary education;
(5) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
(6) "Eligible employer withholding tax", the total amount of tax that the child
care provider was required, under section 143.191, to deduct and withhold from the
wages it paid to employees during the tax year for which the child care provider is
claiming a tax credit pursuant to this section, to the extent actually paid. "Eligible
employer withholding tax" shall not include any additional voluntary withholding
requested by an employee;
(7) "Employee", an employee, as that term is used in subsection 2 of section
143.191, of a child care provider who worked for the child care provider for an average
of at least ten hours per week for at least a three-month period during the tax year for
which a tax credit is claimed pursuant to this section and who is not an immediate
family member of the child care provider;
(8) "Rural area", a town or community within the state that is not within a
metropolitan statistical area and has a population of six thousand or fewer inhabitants
as determined by the last preceding federal decennial census or any unincorporated
area not within a metropolitan statistical area;
(9) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by the taxpayer pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 143, exclusive of the provisions relating to the withholding of tax
as provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;
(10) "Tax credit", a credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability;
(11) "Taxpayer", a corporation as defined in section 143.441 or 143.471, any
charitable organization that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri
unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143, or an individual or partnership subject to the state income
tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143.

HB 2409 11
3. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a child care provider
with three or more employees may claim a tax credit authorized in this section in an
amount equal to the child care provider's eligible employer withholding tax, and may
also claim a tax credit in an amount up to thirty percent of the child care provider's
capital expenditures. No tax credit for capital expenditures shall be allowed if the
capital expenditures are less than one thousand dollars. The amount of any tax credit
issued under this section shall not exceed two hundred thousand dollars per child care
provider per tax year.
4. To claim a tax credit authorized pursuant to this section, a child care provider
shall submit to the department, for preliminary approval, an application for the tax
credit on a form provided by the department and at such times as the department may
require. If the child care provider is applying for a tax credit for capital expenditures,
the child care provider shall present proof acceptable to the department that the child
care provider's capital expenditures satisfy the definition in subdivision (1) of subsection
2 of this section. Upon final approval of an application, the department shall issue the
child care provider a certificate of tax credit.
5. (1) The tax credits authorized by this section shall not be refundable and shall
not be transferred, sold, assigned, or otherwise conveyed. Any amount of credit that
exceeds the child care provider's state tax liability for the tax year for which the tax
credit is issued may be carried forward to the child care provider's subsequent tax year
for up to six succeeding tax years.
(2) In the case of a taxpayer that has or elects pass-through taxation pursuant to
federal income tax law, the tax credits issued pursuant to this section shall be
apportioned in proportion to the share of ownership of the taxpayer on the last day of
the taxpayer's tax period for which such tax credits will be issued, to the following:
(a) The shareholders of the S corporation;
(b) The partners in a partnership; or
(c) The members of a limited liability company that has or elects pass-through
taxation pursuant to federal income tax law.
(3) A taxpayer shall not claim a tax credit pursuant to this section and a tax
credit pursuant to section 135.1310 or 135.1325 for the same contribution or
expenditure.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 5 of this section to the contrary, a
child care provider that is exempt, under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3), and any
amendments thereto, from all or part of the federal income tax shall be eligible for a
refund of its tax credit issued under this section, without regard to whether it has
incurred any state tax liability. Such exempt child care provider may claim a refund of

HB 2409 12
the tax credit on its tax return required to be filed under the provisions of chapter 143,
exclusive of the return for the withholding of tax under sections 143.191 to 143.265. If
such exempt child care provider is not required to file a tax return under the provisions
of chapter 143, the exempt child care provider may claim a refund of the tax credit on a
refund claim form prescribed by the department of revenue. The department of
revenue shall prescribe such forms, instructions, and rules as it deems appropriate to
carry out the provisions of this subsection.
7. (1) The amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to this section shall not
exceed twenty million dollars for each calendar year. The department shall approve tax
credit applications on a first-come, first-served basis until the tax credit authorization
limit is reached for the calendar year.
(2) If the maximum amount of tax credits allowed in any calendar year as
provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection is authorized, the maximum
amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
increased by fifteen percent for such calendar year, provided that all such increases in
the allowable amount of tax credits shall be reserved for child care providers located in
a child care desert. The director of the department shall publish such adjusted amount.
8. The tax credit authorized by this section shall be considered a domestic and
100 social tax credit under subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 135.800.
101 9. All action and communication undertaken or required with respect to this
102 section shall be exempt from section 105.1500. Notwithstanding section 32.057 or any
103 other tax confidentiality law to the contrary, the department of revenue may disclose tax
104 information to the department for the purpose of the verification of a child care
105 provider's eligible employer withholding tax under this section.
106 10. The department may promulgate rules and adopt statements of policy,
107 procedures, forms and guidelines to implement and administer the provisions of this
108 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
109 created pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if
110 it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
111 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
112 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
113 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
114 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
115 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
116 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

HB 2409 13
117 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
118 six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by the general
119 assembly;
120 (2) The act shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
121 following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is
122 sunset; and
123 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or in any way
124 impair the department of revenue's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or before
125 the date the program authorized under this section expires or a taxpayer's ability to
126 redeem such tax credits.
✔